Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-1201
Service Contract Reporting Act, how cited.

Sections 73-1201 to 73-1205 shall be known and may be cited as the Service Contract Reporting Act.

Laws 2026, LB1135, § 1.
July 18, 2026